Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0544.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2026. (1) Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the business of insurance, other than isolated incidents, are a course of conduct indicating a persistent tendency to engage in that type of conduct and include: (a) Misrepresenting pertinent facts or insurance policy provisions relating to coverages at issue. (b) Failing to acknowledge promptly or to act reasonably and promptly upon communications with respect to claims arising under insurance policies. (c) Failing to adopt and implement reasonable standards for the prompt investigation of claims arising under insurance policies. (d) Refusing to pay claims without conducting a reasonable investigation based upon on the available information. (e) Failing to affirm or deny coverage of claims within a reasonable time after proof of loss statements have been completed. (f) Failing to attempt in good faith to effectuate prompt, fair, and equitable settlements of claims in which liability has become reasonably clear. (g) Compelling insureds to institute litigation to recover amounts due under an insurance policy by offering substantially less than the amounts due the insureds. (h) Attempting to settle a claim for less than the amount to which a reasonable person would believe the claimant was entitled, by reference to written or printed advertising material accompanying or made part of an application. (i) Attempting to settle claims on the basis of based on an application which that was altered without notice to, or knowledge or consent of, the insured. (j) Making a claims payment to a policyholder or beneficiary omitting the coverage under which each payment is being made. (k) Making known to insureds or claimants a policy of appealing from arbitration awards in favor of insureds or claimants for the purpose of compelling them to accept settlements or compromises less than the amount awarded in arbitration. (l) Delaying the investigation or payment of claims by requiring an insured, claimant, or the physician of either to submit a preliminary claim report and then requiring subsequent submission of formal proof of loss forms, seeking solely the duplication of a verification. (m) Failing to promptly settle claims where liability has become reasonably clear under 1 portion of the insurance policy coverage in order to influence settlements under other portions of the insurance policy. (n) Failing to promptly provide a reasonable explanation of the basis in the insurance policy in relation to the facts or applicable law for denial of a claim or for the offer of a compromise settlement. (o) Failing to complete underwriting before issuing a policy or certificate or re-underwriting an insurance policy because a claim on that policy is filed. (p) Denying claims due to material facts discovered by the insurer during the claims investigation process that the insurer would have discovered during the underwriting process using reasonable diligence. (2) The failure of a person to maintain a complete record of all the complaints of its insureds which that it has received since the date of the last examination is an unfair method of competition and unfair or deceptive act or practice in the business of insurance. This record shall must indicate the total number of complaints, their classification by line of insurance, the nature of each complaint, the disposition thereof, of each complaint, and the time it took to process each complaint. For purposes of this subsection, "complaint" means a written communication primarily expressing an allegation of acts which that would constitute violation of this chapter. If a complaint relating to an insurer is received by an agent of the insurer, the agent shall promptly forward the complaint to the insurer unless the agent resolves the complaint to the satisfaction of the insured within a reasonable time. An insurer shall not be deemed is not considered to have engaged in an unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the business of insurance in violation of this chapter because of the failure of an agent who is not also an employee to forward a written complaint as required by under this subsection.